Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2609.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chief Jeffory L. Buck and Assistant Chief Robert R. Shick, Jr., Memorial Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Chief Jeffory L. Buck was born November 25, 1965, in West Reading.(2) Chief Buck graduated from Fleetwood Area High School.(3) Chief Buck served with the Walnuttown Fire Company in Richmond Township, Berks County, for a total of 43 years and served as deputy chief for 20 years before becoming chief in 2017.12345678910111213141516171819 (4) Chief Buck worked for East Penn Manufacturing in Lyon Station for 35 years and also worked for the Boyertown Foundry.(5) Outside of work, Chief Buck enjoyed spending time with family, hunting, camping, fishing and wood chopping.(6) Chief Buck married Jennifer M. Badman on April 18, 1992, and had two sons, Robert and Chad.(7) Chief Buck was a member of Alsace Manor Social Quarters.(8) Assistant Chief Robert R. Shick, Jr., was born August 22, 1969, in Abington.(9) Assistant Chief Shick graduated from William Tennent High School.(10) Assistant Chief Shick served with the Walnuttown Fire Company in Richmond Township, Berks County, for more than three decades, including multiple years as assistant chief.(11) Assistant Chief Shick also served for a time with the Virginville Fire Company in Richmond Township, Berks County.(12) Assistant Chief Shick worked for East Penn Manufacturing in Lyon Station for 29 years and for Viwinco Windows and Doors of Morgantown beginning in 2025.(13) Assistant Chief Shick also worked for Don's Roofing in Egypt, Lehigh County, and worked on Clean-Up #3 at Pocono Raceway for 10 years.(14) Outside of work, Assistant Chief Shick enjoyed coaching Fleetwood Youth Soccer Club, camping, four-wheeling, off-roading and spending time with family.(15) Assistant Chief Shick married Jennifer C. Held on 20260HB2609PN3532 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 March 16, 1990, and had two children, Brett and Brittany.(16) Chief Buck and Assistant Chief Shick were fatally injured in the line of duty on April 4, 2026, while conducting a missing person search with the Walnuttown Fire Company along U.S. Route 222.(b) Designation.--The portion of U.S. Route 222 from the intersection with Dries Road in Maidencreek Township to the intersection with Kempsville Road in Richmond Township, Berks County, is designated as the Chief Jeffory L. Buck and Assistant Chief Robert R. Shick, Jr., Memorial Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2609PN3532 - 3 - 123456789101112131415